District of Columbia statutes.
7-204

General requirements.

(a)

Each certificate, record, report, and other document required by this chapter shall be on a form or in a format prescribed by the Registrar.

(b)

Each vital record shall contain the date of registration.

(c)

Information required in a certificate or report may be filed and registered by photographic, electronic, or other means as prescribed by the Registrar.

(d)

Each form may include each item recommended by the federal agency responsible for national vital statistics.

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 5, 28 DCR 3271
1981 Ed., § 6-204.